South Dakota, session 2026, HB1256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 5-15-34 be AMENDED:
5-15-34. The commissioner of human resources and administration the Bureau of
Human Resources and Administration may promulgate such rules, pursuant to chapter 1-
26 as may be necessary to promote the, regarding the capitol complex and grounds, which
are necessary to:
(1) Promote health, safety, and general welfare, to prohibit;
(2) Prohibit public intoxication, disturbances, and disorderly assemblies, to keep;
(3) Keep the peace, and to declare what; and
(4) Declare that which constitutes a nuisance within the buildings of the capitol
complex and the capitol grounds.
These rules may include the regulation of hours of general public accessibility to
buildings within the capitol complex and the regulation of obstruction, speed limits, and
parking on the streets and alleys within the capitol grounds.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 5-15:
The commissioner of the Bureau of Human Resources and Administration shall:
(1) Promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, regulating general public accessibility
to the buildings within the capitol complex; and
(2) Permit the holder of a capitol access pass to access all outside entrances into the
Capitol complex, which are accessible by electronic access card.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.